third_party/liblouis/src/tables/vi-vn-g2.ctb
match %a uy %[a_.^] 45
match %a úy %[a_.^] 35-45
match %a ùy %[a_.^] 56-45
match %a ủy %[a_.^] 26-45
match %a ũy %[a_.^] 36-45
match %a ụy %[a_.^] 6-45
# processing tone marks placed on letter y
word uý 35-136-13456
word uỳ 56-136-13456
word uỷ 26-136-13456
word uỹ 36-136-13456
word uỵ 6-136-13456
match %a uý %[a_.^] 35-45
match %a uỳ %[a_.^] 56-45
match %a uỷ %[a_.^] 26-45
match %a uỹ %[a_.^] 36-45
match %a uỵ %[a_.^] 6-45

# uyê vowel groups just combined with letter n and t but already have contraction
# so just simply define for words uyên and uyển
word uyên 235-1345
word uyển 26-235-1345
match %a uyê %a 235
match %a uyế %a 35-235
match %a uyề %a 56-235
match %a uyể %a 26-235
match %a uyễ %a 36-235
match %a uyệ %a 6-235

# self-accent parts without contractions
match %a áp %[_.^] 1-1234
match %a ắc %[_.^] 345-14
match %a ắp %[_.^] 345-1234
match %a ấc %[_.^] 16-14
match %a éc %[_.^] 15-14
match %a ép %[_.^] 15-1234
match %a ét %[_.^] 15-2345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ếch %[_.^] 126-13
match %a ếp %[_.^] 126-1234
match %a ết %[_.^] 126-2345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ích %[_.^] 24-13
match %a íp %[_.^] 24-1234
match %a ít %[_.^] 24-2345
match %a óc %[_.^] 135-14
match %a óp %[_.^] 135-1234
match %a ót %[_.^] 135-2345
match %a ốc %[_.^] 1456-14
match %a ốp %[_.^] 1456-1234
match %a ớp %[_.^] 246-1234
match %a ớt %[_.^] 246-2345
match %a úc %[_.^] 136-14
match %a úp %[_.^] 136-1234
match %a út %[_.^] 136-2345
match %a ứt %[_.^] 1256-2345


# rhyme contractions
match %a ac %[_.^] 14
match %a ác %[_.^] 14
match %a ạc %[_.^] 6-14

match %a ach %[_.^] 146
match %a ách %[_.^] 146
match %a ạch %[_.^] 6-146

match %a ai %[_^] 35
match %a ái %[_.^] 35-35
match %a ài %[_.^] 56-35
match %a ải %[_.^] 26-35
match %a ãi %[_.^] 36-35
match %a ại %[_.^] 6-35

always am! 1-134-235
always ám! 35-1-134-235
always àm! 56-1-134-235
always ảm! 26-1-134-235
always ãm! 36-1-134-235
always ạm! 6-1-134-235
match %a am %[_.^] 235
match %a ám %[_.^] 35-235
match %a àm %[_.^] 56-235
match %a ảm %[_.^] 26-235
match %a ãm %[_.^] 36-235
match %a ạm %[^_.] 6-235

# no contracted if followed a punctuation
match %a an %[_^] 6
match %a án %[_.^] 35-6
match %a àn %[_.^] 56-6
match %a ản %[_.^] 26-6
match %a ãn %[_.^] 36-6
match %a ạn %[_.^] 6-6

match %a ang %[_.^] 123
match %a áng %[_.^] 35-123
match %a àng %[_.^] 56-123
match %a ảng %[_.^] 26-123
match %a ãng %[_.^] 36-123
match %a ạng %[_.^] 6-123

match %a|![o\s] anh %[_.^] 125
match %a|![o\s] ánh %[_.^] 35-125
match %a|![o\s] ành %[_.^] 56-125
match %a|![o\s] ảnh %[_.^] 26-125
match %a|![o\s] ãnh %[_.^] 36-125
match %a|![o\s] ạnh %[_.^] 6-125

match %a ao %[_^] 26
match %a áo %[_.^] 35-26
match %a ào %[_.^] 56-26
match %a ảo %[_.^] 26-26
match %a ão %[_.^] 36-26
match %a ạo %[_.^] 6-26

match %a at %[_.^] 12356
match %a át %[_.^] 12356
match %a ạt %[_.^] 6-12356

match %a ay %[_.^] 23
match %a áy %[_.^] 35-23
match %a ày %[_.^] 56-23
match %a ảy %[_.^] 26-23
match %a ãy %[_.^] 36-23
match %a ạy %[_.^] 6-23

match %a ăm %[_.^] 124
match %a ắm %[_.^] 35-124
match %a ằm %[_.^] 56-124
match %a ẳm %[_.^] 26-124
match %a ẵm %[_.^] 36-124
match %a ặm %[_.^] 6-124

match %a ăn %[_.^] 345
match %a ắn %[_.^] 35-345
match %a ằn %[_.^] 56-345
match %a ẳn %[_.^] 26-345
match %a ẵn %[_.^] 36-345
match %a ặn %[_.^] 6-345

match %a ăng %[_.^] 456
match %a ắng %[_.^] 35-456
match %a ằng %[_.^] 56-456
match %a ẳng %[_.^] 26-456
match %a ẵng %[_.^] 36-456
match %a ặng %[_.^] 6-456

match %a ăt %[_.^] 23456
match %a ắt %[_.^] 23456
match %a ặt %[_.^] 6-23456

match %a âm %[_.^] 1346
match %a ấm %[_.^] 35-1346
match %a ầm %[_.^] 56-1346
match %a ẩm %[_.^] 26-1346
match %a ẫm %[_.^] 36-1346
match %a ậm %[_.^] 6-1346

match %a|![u\s] ân %[_.^] 16
match %a|![u\s] ấn %[_.^] 35-16
match %a|![u\s] ần %[_.^] 56-16
match %a|![u\s] ẩn %[_.^] 26-16
match %a|![u\s] ẫn %[_.^] 36-16
match %a|![u\s] ận %[_.^] 6-16

match %a|![i\s] ên %[_.^] 1345
match %a|![i\s] ến %[_.^] 35-1345
match %a|![i\s] ền %[_.^] 56-1345
match %a|![i\s] ển %[_.^] 26-1345
match %a|![i\s] ễn %[_.^] 36-1345
match %a|![i\s] ện %[_.^] 6-1345


word ấp 16-1234
match %[a_^] ấp %. 16-1234
match %a ấp %[_^] 56
match %a ập %[_.^] 6-56

match %a ât %[_.^] 2345
match %a ất %[_.^] 2345
match %a ật %[_.^] 6-2345

match %a ây %[_.^] 12
match %a ấy %[_.^] 35-12
match %a ầy %[_.^] 56-12
match %a ẩy %[_.^] 26-12
match %a ẫy %[_.^] 36-12
match %a ậy %[_.^] 6-12

match %a âu %[_.^] 346
match %a ấu %[_.^] 35-346
match %a ầu %[_.^] 56-346
match %a ẩu %[_.^] 26-346
match %a ẫu %[_.^] 36-346
match %a ậu %[_.^] 6-346

match %a ia %[_.^] 34
match %a ía %[_.^] 35-34
match %a ìa %[_.^] 56-34
match %a ỉa %[_.^] 26-34
match %a ĩa %[_.^] 36-34
match %a ịa %[_.^] 6-34
match %a ya %[_.^] 34

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iêc %[_.^] 36
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iếc %[_.^] 36
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iệc %[_.^] 6-36

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iêm %[_.^] 134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iếm %[_.^] 35-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iềm %[_.^] 56-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iểm %[_.^] 26-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iễm %[_.^] 36-134
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iệm %[_.^] 6-134

match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iên %[_.^] 1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iến %[_.^] 35-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iền %[_.^] 56-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iển %[_.^] 26-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iễn %[_.^] 36-1356
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] iện %[_.^] 6-1356

match %a iêp %[_.^] 1234
match %a iếp %[_.^] 1234
match %a iệp %[_.^] 6-1234

match %a iêt %[_.^] 12456
match %a iết %[_.^] 12456
match %a iệt %[_.^] 6-12456

match %a inh %[_.^] 236
match %a ính %[_.^] 35-236
match %a ình %[_.^] 56-236
match %a ỉnh %[_.^] 26-236
match %a ĩnh %[_.^] 36-236
match %a ịnh %[_.^] 6-236

match %a oi %[_.^] 356
match %a ói %[_.^] 35-356
match %a òi %[_.^] 56-356
match %a ỏi %[_.^] 26-356
match %a õi %[_.^] 36-356
match %a ọi %[_.^] 6-356

match %a on %[_.^] 1236
match %a ón %[_.^] 35-1236
match %a òn %[_.^] 56-1236
match %a ỏn %[_.^] 26-1236
match %a õn %[_.^] 36-1236
match %a ọn %[_.^] 6-1236

match %a ong %[_.^] 2356
match %a óng %[_.^] 35-2356
match %a òng %[_.^] 56-2356
match %a ỏng %[_.^] 26-2356
match %a õng %[_.^] 36-2356
match %a ọng %[_.^] 6-2356

match %a ôi %[_.^] 245
match %a ối %[_.^] 35-245
match %a ồi %[_.^] 56-245
match %a ổi %[_.^] 26-245
match %a ỗi %[_.^] 36-245
match %a ội %[_.^] 6-245

match %a ông %[_.^] 1245
match %a ống %[_.^] 35-1245
match %a ồng %[_.^] 56-1245
match %a ổng %[_.^] 26-1245
match %a ỗng %[_.^] 36-1245
match %a ộng %[_.^] 6-1245

match %a ôt %[_.^] 1246
match %a ốt %[_.^] 1246
match %a ột %[_.^] 6-1246

match %a ơi %[_.^] 2456
match %a ới %[_.^] 35-2456
match %a ời %[_.^] 56-2456
match %a ởi %[_.^] 26-2456
match %a ỡi %[_.^] 36-2456
match %a ợi %[_.^] 6-2456

match %a ơn %[_.^] 3456
match %a ớn %[_.^] 35-3456
match %a ờn %[_.^] 56-3456
match %a ởn %[_.^] 26-3456
match %a ỡn %[_.^] 36-3456
match %a ợn %[_.^] 6-3456

match %a ua %[_.^] 12346
match %a úa %[_.^] 35-12346
match %a ùa %[_.^] 56-12346
match %a ủa %[_.^] 26-12346
match %a ũa %[_.^] 36-12346
match %a ụa %[_.^] 6-12346

match %a ung %[_.^] 13
match %a úng %[_.^] 35-13
match %a ùng %[_.^] 56-13
match %a ủng %[_.^] 26-13
match %a ũng %[_.^] 36-13
match %a ụng %[_.^] 6-13

match %a uôc %[_.^] 1235
match %a uốc %[_.^] 1235
match %a uộc %[_.^] 6-1235

match %a uyêt %[_.^] 123456
match %a uyết %[_.^] 123456
match %a uyệt %[_.^] 6-123456

match %a ưa %[_.^] 156
match %a ứa %[_.^] 35-156
match %a ừa %[_.^] 56-156
match %a ửa %[_.^] 26-156
match %a ữa %[_.^] 36-156
match %a ựa %[_.^] 6-156

match %a ưc %[_.^] 234
match %a ức %[_.^] 234
match %a ực %[_.^] 6-234

match %a ươc %[_.^] 25
match %a ước %[_.^] 25
match %a ược %[_.^] 6-25

match %a ươi %[_.^] 145
match %a ưới %[_.^] 35-145
match %a ười %[_.^] 56-145
match %a ưởi %[_.^] 26-145
match %a ưỡi %[_.^] 36-145
match %a ượi %[_.^] 6-145

match %a ương %[_.^] 256
match %a ướng %[_.^] 35-256
match %a ường %[_.^] 56-256
match %a ưởng %[_.^] 26-256
match %a ưỡng %[_.^] 36-256
match %a ượng %[_.^] 6-256

word uyên 45-1345
word uyển 26-45-1345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uyên %[_.^] 12345
match %a uyến %[_.^] 35-12345
match %a uyền %[_.^] 56-12345
match %[a_^]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] uyển %[_.^] 26-12345
match %a uyễn %[_.^] 36-12345
match %a uyện %[_.^] 6-12345

match %a ưng %[_.^] 46
match %a ứng %[_.^] 35-46
match %a ừng %[_.^] 56-46
match %a ửng %[_.^] 26-46
match %a ững %[_.^] 36-46
match %a ựng %[_.^] 6-46

#match %a yên %[_.^] 1356

# double consonants
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ch %a 146
match %a ch %[_.^] 13
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] gi %a 245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] gh %a 1245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] kh %a 12356
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ng %a 346
match %a ng %[_.^] 1245
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ngh %a 12456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] nh %a 1246
match %a nh %[_.^] 125
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] ph %a 124
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] th %a 2456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] tr %a 23456
match %[^_]|[\x0022\x0028\x0027\x007B\x005B] qu %a 12345

match %a iêu %[_.^] 2346
match %a iếu %[_.^] 35-2346
match %a iều %[_.^] 56-2346
match %a iểu %[_.^] 26-2346
match %a iễu %[_.^] 36-2346
match %a iệu %[_.^] 6-2346


# disabled, encourage to place tone marks right infront of capital vowel letters, instead of before cap indicator
#noback pass2 @46-35 @35-46
#noback pass2 @46-56 @56-46
#noback pass2 @46-26 @26-46
#noback pass2 @46-36 @36-46
#noback pass2 @46-6 @6-46
